Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4107.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1170a. (1) By not later than the 2017-2018 school year, the The department shall ensure that the recommended model core academic curriculum content standards for health education and the subject area content expectations and guidelines for health education under described in section 1278a provide for all of the following: (a) Instruction in cardiopulmonary resuscitation for pupils enrolled in grades 7 to 12. Subject to subsection (5), the content standards and subject area content expectations shall guidelines must ensure that the psychomotor skills necessary to perform cardiopulmonary resuscitation are incorporated into the instruction. and that the instruction is For pupils who are able to physically participate, the psychomotor skills necessary to perform cardiopulmonary resuscitation are strongly encouraged to be incorporated into the instruction described in this subdivision through the provision of hands-on training. The instruction described in this subdivision must be based on either of the following: (i) An instructional program developed by the American Red Cross or the American Heart Association. (ii) Nationally recognized, evidence-based guidelines for cardiopulmonary resuscitation. (b) Instruction about automated external defibrillators for pupils enrolled in grades 7 to 12. (c) Instruction for pupils enrolled in grades 7 to 12 that is developed by the Stop the Bleed program or the American College of Surgeons Committee on Trauma or determined appropriate by the department concerning the use of first aid response kits. For pupils who are able to physically participate, the instruction described in this subdivision is strongly encouraged to be through the provision of hands-on training. The first aid response kits described in this subdivision must be kits that contain at least all of the following: (i) A tourniquet. (ii) Bleeding control dressings. (iii) Compression bandages. (iv) Latex-free protective gloves. (v) Trauma shears. (vi) A marker. (vii) A copy of instructions on the use of the kit as described in this subdivision. (2) The content standards or subject area content expectations and guidelines under subsection (1) shall must not require a certificated teacher to be an authorized CPR/AED instructor to facilitate, provide, or oversee instruction described in subsection (1)(a) if that instruction does not result in a pupil earning a CPR certification card or status. (3) If instruction described in subsection (1)(a) will result in a pupil earning a CPR certification card or status, that instruction must be taught by an authorized CPR/AED instructor, as applicable. (4) School districts, public school academies, and nonpublic schools are encouraged to use locally available resources to provide the instruction required to meet the content standards or subject area content expectations and guidelines under subsection (1), including, but not limited to, emergency any of the following: (a) Emergency medical technicians. , paramedics, police (b) Paramedics. (c) Police officers. , firefighters, representatives (d) Firefighters. (e) Licensed registered professional nurses, including school nurses. (f) Representatives of the American Heart Association or American Red Cross. , or properly (g) Properly trained teachers or other school employees who are trained as Stop the Bleed instructors. (5) The content standards and subject area content expectations and guidelines required under subsection (1) shall must provide that a school or program that provides 100% online instruction is exempt from having to incorporate psychomotor skills into the instruction under this section. (6) As used in this section: (a) "Authorized CPR/AED instructor" means an instructor who is authorized by the American Heart Association, American Red Cross, or a similar nationally recognized association to provide instruction in cardiopulmonary resuscitation that results in the issuance of a CPR certification card or status. (b) "CPR certification card or status" means a card or other credential evidencing successful completion of instruction in cardiopulmonary resuscitation that is issued by the American Heart Association, American Red Cross, or a similar nationally recognized organization using evidence-based guidelines for the teaching of cardiopulmonary resuscitation.